Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-462
Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act, how cited.

Sections 60-462 to 60-4,189 shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Operator's License Act.

Laws 1937, c. 141, § 31, p. 523;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-434;

R.S.1943, § 60-402;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-402;

Laws 1989, LB 284, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 12;

Laws 1990, LB 980, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 44, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 105, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 65;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 211, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 1;

Laws 1997, LB 210, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 256, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 1;

Laws 2001, LB 38, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 209, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 853, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB415, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB158, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB93, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 19;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 13;

Laws 2018, LB629, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 73;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 45;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 15;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB972, § 53;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 74.
The Revisor of Statutes has pursuant to section 49-769 correlated LB972, section 53, with LB1126, section 74, to reflect all amendments.Changes made by LB972 became operative July 18, 2026. Changes made by LB1126 became effective July 18, 2026.